Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. General.

Secs. 45.07.101 — 45.07.105.
Short title; definitions and index of definitions; relation of sections to treaty, statute, tariff, classification, or regulation; negotiable and nonnegotiable warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title; construction against negative implication. [Repealed, § 113 ch. 44 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 45.07.111.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Commercial Code — Documents of Title.

History.

(§ 30 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 119, ch. 44, SLA 2009 makes this section effective January 1, 2010.

Sec. 45.07.112.
Definitions and index of definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“bailee” means a person who, by a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title, acknowledges possession of goods and contracts to deliver them;

“carrier” means a person who issues a bill of lading;

“consignee” means a person named in a bill of lading to whom or to whose order the bill promises delivery;

“consignor” means a person named in a bill of lading as the person from whom the goods have been received for shipment;

“delivery order” means a record that contains an order to deliver goods directed to a warehouse, carrier, or other person who, in the ordinary course of business, issues warehouse receipts or bills of lading;

“goods” means all things that are treated as movable for the purposes of a contract for storage or transportation;

“issuer” means a bailee who issues a document of title or, in the case of an unaccepted delivery order, the person who orders the possessor of goods to deliver; “issuer” includes a person for whom an agent or employee purports to act in issuing a document if the agent or employee has real or apparent authority to issue documents, even if the issuer did not receive the goods, the goods were misdescribed, or in another respect the agent or employee violated the issuer’s instructions;

“person entitled under the document” means the holder, in the case of a negotiable document of title, or the person to whom delivery of the goods is to be made by the terms of, or under instructions in a record under, a nonnegotiable document of title;

“shipper” means a person who enters into a contract of transportation with a carrier;

“sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to

execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process;

“warehouse” means a person engaged in the business of storing goods for hire.

Definitions in other chapters applying to this chapter and the sections in which the definitions appear are

“contract for sale” (AS

45.02.106

);

“lessee in ordinary course of business” (AS

45.12.103

);

“receipt” of goods (AS

45.02.103

).

In addition, AS 45.01 contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this chapter.

History.

(§ 30 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 119, ch. 44, SLA 2009 makes this section effective January 1, 2010.

Sec. 45.07.113.
Relation of chapter to treaty or statute.

This chapter is subject to a treaty or statute of the United States or regulatory statute of this state to the extent the treaty, statute, or regulatory statute is applicable.

This chapter does not modify or repeal a law prescribing the form or content of a document of title or the services or facilities to be afforded by a bailee, or otherwise regulating a bailee’s business in respects not specifically treated in this chapter. However, violation of a law described under the previous sentence does not affect the status of a document of title that otherwise is within the definition of a document of title.

To the extent there is a conflict between AS 09.80 and this chapter, this chapter governs.

History.

(§ 30 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 119, ch. 44, SLA 2009 makes this section effective January 1, 2010.

Sec. 45.07.114.
Negotiable and nonnegotiable document of title.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, a document of title is negotiable if by its terms the goods are to be delivered to bearer or to the order of a named person.

A document of title other than one described in (a) of this section is nonnegotiable. A bill of lading that states that the goods are consigned to a named person is not made negotiable by a provision that the goods are to be delivered only against an order in a record signed by the same or another named person.

A document of title is nonnegotiable if, at the time it is issued, the document has a conspicuous legend, however expressed, that it is nonnegotiable.

History.

(§ 30 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 119, ch. 44, SLA 2009 makes this section effective January 1, 2010.

Sec. 45.07.115.
Reissuance in alternative medium.

On request of a person entitled under an electronic document of title, the issuer of the electronic document may issue a tangible document of title as a substitute for the electronic document if

the person entitled under the electronic document surrenders control of the document to the issuer; and

the tangible document when issued contains a statement that it is issued in substitution for the electronic document.

Upon issuance of a tangible document of title in substitution for an electronic document of title under (a) of this section,

the electronic document ceases to have effect or validity; and

the person who procured issuance of the tangible document warrants to all subsequent persons entitled under the tangible document that the warrantor was a person entitled under the electronic document when the warrantor surrendered control of the electronic document to the issuer.

On request of a person entitled under a tangible document of title, the issuer of the tangible document may issue an electronic document of title as a substitute for the tangible document if

the person entitled under the tangible document surrenders possession of the document to the issuer; and

the electronic document when issued contains a statement that it is issued in substitution for the tangible document.

On issuance of an electronic document of title in substitution for a tangible document of title under (c) of this section,

the tangible document ceases to have effect or validity; and

the person who procured issuance of the electronic document warrants to all subsequent persons entitled under the electronic document that the warrantor was a person entitled under the tangible document when the warrantor surrendered possession of the tangible document to the issuer.

History.

(§ 30 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 119, ch. 44, SLA 2009 makes this section effective January 1, 2010.

Sec. 45.07.116.
Control of electronic document of title.

A person has control of an electronic document of title if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the electronic document reliably establishes that person as the person to whom the electronic document was issued or transferred.

A system satisfies (a) of this section, and a person is considered to have control of an electronic document of title, if the document is created, stored, and assigned in a manner by which

a single authoritative copy of the document exists that is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in (4), (5), and (6) of this subsection, unalterable;

the authoritative copy identifies the person asserting control as

the person to whom the document was issued; or

if the authoritative copy indicates that the document has been transferred, the person to whom the document was most recently transferred;

the authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the person asserting control or the person’s designated custodian;

copies or amendments that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the person asserting control;

each copy of the authoritative copy and a copy of a copy are readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

an amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

History.

(§ 30 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 119, ch. 44, SLA 2009 makes this section effective January 1, 2010.